Wisconsin, session 2025, SB848.
do enact as follows:SB848,11Section 1. 60.53 of the statutes is amended to read:SB848,2,3260.53 Service pipes and laterals. Sections 62.16 (2) and 66.0911 (1), 3relating to service pipes and laterals, are applicable to towns.SB848,24Section 2. 62.16 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB848,3,3562.16 (2) (a) Expense. Whenever the council, department of transportation, or 6county board shall declare its intention to improve any street in which water, gas, or 7heat mains and sewers, or any of them, shall have been previously laid or are to be 8laid the council shall also by resolution require water, heat, sewer and gas service 9pipes to be first laid in such street, at the cost of the property fronting therein, 10except as herein provided, from the sewer, water, heat and gas mains in such street 11to the curb line on either or both sides thereof, at such intervals as the council shall 12direct along that part of said street to be improved, except at street and alley 13crossings. Such work may be done by contract or by the city directly without the 14intervention of a contractor, under the supervision of the board of public works, or 15in the case of service pipes of a municipal owned utility under the supervision of the 16board or officers charged with the management of such utility. The board or 17officers under whose supervision such service pipes shall be laid shall keep an 18accurate account of the expenses of putting in the same in front of each lot or parcel 19of land, whether the work be done by contract or otherwise, and report the same to 20the comptroller who shall annually prepare a statement of the expenses so incurred 21in front of each lot or parcel of land, and report the same to the city clerk, and, 22except as provided in s. 66.0911 (2), the amount therein charged to each lot or parcel 1of land shall be by such clerk entered in the tax roll as a special tax against said lot 2or parcel of land, and the same shall be collected in all respects like other taxes 3upon real estate.SB848,34Section 3. 66.0911 of the statutes is renumbered 66.0911 (1).SB848,45Section 4. 66.0911 (2) of the statutes is created to read:SB848,3,9666.0911 (2) (a) The governing body of a city of the first class may construct 7water, heat, sewer, and gas laterals or service pipes under sub. (1) without express 8permission from the owner of the lot or parcel if all of the following conditions are 9met:SB848,3,10101. The owner is not a resident of the lot or parcel.SB848,3,12112. After at least 3 attempts by mail, email, phone, or other reasonable means, 12the governing body has failed to make contact with the owner.SB848,3,14133. The governing body receives express permission from a tenant of the lot or 14parcel to construct the laterals or service pipes.SB848,3,1615(b) Notwithstanding sub. (1), the governing body may not charge against the 16lot or parcel the cost of constructing laterals or service pipes.SB848,517Section 5. 704.05 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB848,4,218704.05 (3) Use of premises, additions or alterations by tenant. The 19Except as provided in s. 66.0911 (2), the tenant can make no physical changes in the 20nature of the premises, including decorating, removing, altering or adding to the 21structures thereon, without prior consent of the landlord. The tenant cannot use 22the premises for any unlawful purpose nor in such manner as to interfere 1unreasonably with use by another occupant of the same building or group of 2buildings.SB848,4,33